Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4026.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. The Department of Consumer and Business Services shall study consumer
protection. The department shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to consumer protection not later than September 15, 2027.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.

NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 149